Nevada, session 83, SB328.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 385A of NRS is hereby amended by
adding thereto a new section to read as follows:
The annual report of accountability prepared pursuant to NRS
385A.070 must include, for each school in the school district,
including, without limitation, each charter school sponsored by
the school district, information on:
1. How many heating, ventilation and air-conditioning
systems at each school are in need of repair or replacement;
2. For each issue described in subsection 1, the duration of
the issue necessitating the repair or replacement; and
3. For each issue described in subsection 1, the cost and the
timeline for obtaining the necessary repair or replacement.
Sec. 2. NRS 385A.070 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385A.070 1. The board of trustees of each school district in
this State, in cooperation with associations recognized by the State
Board as representing licensed educational personnel in the district,
shall adopt a program providing for the accountability of the school
district to the residents of the district and to the State Board for the
quality of the schools and the educational achievement of the pupils
in the district, including, without limitation, pupils enrolled in
charter schools sponsored by the school district. The board of
trustees of each school district shall report the information required
by NRS 385A.070 to 385A.320, inclusive, and section 1 of this act
for each charter school sponsored by the school district. The
information for charter schools must be reported separately.
2. The board of trustees of each school district shall, on or
before December 31 of each year, prepare for the immediately
preceding school year a single annual report of accountability
concerning the educational goals and objectives of the school
district, the information prescribed by NRS 385A.070 to 385A.320,
inclusive, and section 1 of this act and such other information as is
-
*SB328*

– 3 –
directed by the Superintendent of Public Instruction. A separate
reporting for a group of pupils must not be made pursuant to NRS
385A.070 to 385A.320, inclusive, and section 1 of this act if the
number of pupils in that group is insufficient to yield statistically
reliable information or the results would reveal personally
identifiable information about an individual pupil. The Department
shall use the mechanism approved by the United States Department
of Education for the statewide system of accountability for public
schools for determining the minimum number of pupils that must be
in a group for that group to yield statistically reliable information.
3. The State Public Charter School Authority, each college or
university within the Nevada System of Higher Education and each
city or county that sponsors a charter school shall, on or before
December 31 of each year, prepare for the immediately preceding
school year an annual report of accountability of the charter schools
sponsored by the State Public Charter School Authority or
institution, as applicable, concerning the accountability information
prescribed by the Department pursuant to this section. The
Department, in consultation with the State Public Charter School
Authority, each college or university within the Nevada System of
Higher Education and each city or county that sponsors a charter
school, shall prescribe by regulation the information that must be
prepared by the State Public Charter School Authority and
institution, as applicable, which must include, without limitation, the
information contained in subsection 2 and NRS 385A.070 to
385A.320, inclusive, and section 1 of this act, as applicable to
charter schools. The Department shall provide for public
dissemination of the annual report of accountability prepared
pursuant to this section by posting a copy of the report on the
Internet website maintained by the Department.
4. The annual report of accountability prepared pursuant to this
section must be presented in an understandable and uniform format
and, to the extent practicable, provided in a language that parents
can understand.
Sec. 3. NRS 354.596 is hereby amended to read as follows:
354.596 1. The officer charged by law shall prepare, or the
governing body shall cause to be prepared, on appropriate forms
prescribed by the Department of Taxation for the use of local
governments, a tentative budget for the ensuing fiscal year. The
tentative budget for the following fiscal year must be submitted to
the county auditor and filed for public record and inspection in the
office of:
(a) The clerk or secretary of the governing body; and
(b) The county clerk.
-
*SB328*

– 4 –
2. On or before April 15, a copy of the tentative budget must
be submitted:
(a) To the Department of Taxation; and
(b) In the case of school districts, to the Department of
Education.
3. The tentative budget of a school district must include,
without limitation, the following information, disaggregated by
each school within the school district:
(a) The total number and salaries of licensed teachers in full-
time positions or in part-time positions added together to represent
full-time positions which are included in the tentative budget;
(b) The proposed expenditures for health insurance for
licensed teachers; and
(c) The proposed expenditures for fringe benefits, excluding
health insurance, for licensed teachers.
4. At the time of filing the tentative budget, the governing body
shall give notice of the time and place of a public hearing on the
tentative budget and shall cause a notice of the hearing to be
published once in a newspaper of general circulation within the area
of the local government not more than 14 nor less than 7 days before
the date set for the hearing. The notice of public hearing must state:
(a) The time and place of the public hearing.
(b) That a tentative budget has been prepared in such detail and
on appropriate forms as prescribed by the Department of Taxation.
(c) The places where copies of the tentative budget are on file
and available for public inspection.
[4.] 5. The public hearing on the tentative budget must be held
by the governing body not sooner than the third Monday in May and
not later than the last day in May.
[5.] 6. The Department of Taxation shall examine the
submitted documents for compliance with law and with appropriate
regulations and shall submit to the governing body at least 3 days
before the public hearing a written certificate of compliance or a
written notice of lack of compliance. The written notice must
indicate the manner in which the submitted documents fail to
comply with law or appropriate regulations.
[6.] 7. Whenever the governing body receives from the
Department of Taxation a notice of lack of compliance, the
governing body shall forthwith proceed to amend the tentative
budget to effect compliance with the law and with the appropriate
regulation.
Sec. 4. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*SB328*